Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1637
Complaint; hearing; violation; actions of board.

If, upon all the evidence at the hearing, the board finds that a private postsecondary career school or its agent, or both, has engaged in or is engaging in any act or practice which violates the Private Postsecondary Career School Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act, the board shall issue and cause to be served upon such school or agent, or both, an order requiring such school or agent, or both, to cease and desist from such act or practice. The board may also, as appropriate, based on its own investigation or the evidence adduced at such hearing, or both, commence an action to revoke a school's authorization to operate or an agent's permit.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 37;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 37;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2837;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 37.